Hawaii statutes.
[SUBTITLE 7.
ENFORCEMENT]

CHAPTER
199

CONSERVATION
AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM

Section

199-1 Board of land and natural resources,
powers and

duties

199-1.5 Conservation and resources enforcement
special fund;

established

199-2 Board of land and natural resources,
delegation of

authority

199-3 Conservation and resources enforcement
officers,

duties; other law enforcement officers

199-4 Board of land and natural resources,
police powers

199-5 Summons or citation

199-6 Failure to obey a summons

199-7 Search and seizure; forfeiture of property

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next